Hawaii statutes.
[§508C-6] Relationship to other land use
law. This chapter shall not authorize a use of real property that is
otherwise prohibited by zoning, by law other than this chapter regulating use
of real property, or by a recorded instrument that has priority over the
environmental covenant. An environmental covenant may prohibit or restrict
uses of real property that are authorized by zoning or by law other than this
chapter. [L 2006, c 279, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next